New York, session 2025-2026, S10310.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Pursuant to section 106-b of the uniform justice court act, 2 the towns of Ellington and Charlotte in Chautauqua County have conducted 3 and completed a study, each town having adopted a joint resolution 4 providing for the study, conducted a public hearing upon the findings of 5 the study, and adopted a joint resolution adopting such plan providing 6 for the abolition of existing town justice positions in the towns of 7 Ellington and Charlotte and providing for the election of a single town 8 justice to preside in the town courts of such towns. The town justice 9 elected pursuant to this plan shall preside in the towns of Ellington 10 and Charlotte following the next general election in such towns and 11 shall preside for the year term as elected. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15616-01-6